Arkansas, session 2025, HB1328.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 24-6-306(a), concerning the maximum number
of years of participation in the Arkansas State Police Officers Deferred
Option Plan in Tier One, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The duration of participation in the Arkansas State Police
Officers Deferred Option Plan for active state police officers shall not
exceed seven (7) ten (10) years.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 24-6-507(a), concerning the maximum number
of years of participation in the Arkansas State Police Officers' Tier Two
Deferred Retirement Option Plan, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The duration of participation in the Arkansas State Police
Officers' Tier Two Deferred Retirement Option Plan for an active state police
*LJH047*
01/30/2025 9:08:17 AM LJH047

HB1328
officer shall not exceed seven (7) ten (10) years.



































01/30/2025 9:08:17 AM LJH047